Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.525

Complaint procedures.

The state-based administrative complaint procedures required in the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252) and detailed in administrative rule apply to all primary, general, and special elections administered under this title.

[ 2004 c 267 s 401.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.